Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.122

Provisions for bicycle paths, lanes, routes, roadways and improvements to be included in annual revision or extension of comprehensive road programs—Exception.

The annual revision and extension of comprehensive road programs pursuant to RCW 36.81.121 shall include consideration of and, wherever reasonably practicable, provisions for bicycle paths, lanes, routes, and roadways: PROVIDED, That no provision need be made for such a path, lane, route, or roadway where the cost of establishing it would be excessively disproportionate to the need or probable use.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 141 s 9.]